dix/apertium-eo-fr.eo-crossed.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 7576
	Sdefs: 91
	Paradigms: 111

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acc" /> 
    <sdef n="nomiacc" /> 
    <sdef n="nomi" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="past" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="obj" /> 
    <sdef n="subj" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="gerpast" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pp2" /> 
    <sdef n="pp3" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="subs" /> 
    <sdef n="pres" /> 
    <sdef n="pprs" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" /> 
    <sdef n="sint" /> 
    <sdef n="unc" /> 
    <sdef n="sep" /> 
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aj</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajn</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomacc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomacc0">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sgpl">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBC__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="nomacc0" /> 
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="nomacc0" /> 
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="acr"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="sgpl" /> 
        <par n="nomacc" /> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adiós__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="ij"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="guionet">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-</l> 
        <r>-<s n="guio"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>,</l> 
        <r>,<s n="cm"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'</l> 
        <r>'<s n="apos"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sent"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adj__adjINICIAL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jam__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tro__preadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="preadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="where__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kaj__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ke__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="the__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ERC">
        <i>ERC</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="EU">
        <i>EU</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ICV">
        <i>ICV</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="NATO">
        <i>NATO</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="PP">
        <i>PP</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="VAT">
        <i>VAT</i> 
        <par n="BBC__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="adiaŭ">
        <i>adiaŭ</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="antaŭhieraŭ">
        <i>antaŭhieraŭ</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bone">
        <i>bone</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="brutala">
        <i>brutal</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="colo">
        <i>col</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="denove">
        <i>denov</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dumviva">
        <i>dumviva</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fanatika">
        <i>fanatik</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="favore">
        <i>favor</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="funkciado">
        <i>funkciad</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="integra">
        <i>integr</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="inter martelo kaj amboso">
        <i>inter<b/>martelo<b/>kaj<b/>amboso</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kaj">
        <i>kaj</i> 
        <par n="kaj__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="antaŭ">
        <i>kaj<b/>antaŭ</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ke">
        <i>ke</i> 
        <par n="ke__cnjsub" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ke">
        <i>ke</i> 
        <par n="ke__cnjsub" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kiel">
        <i>kiel</i> 
        <par n="kaj__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="komploto">
        <i>komplot</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="krom se">
        <i>krom<b/>se</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kutime">
        <i>kutim</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="liberala">
        <i>liberal</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malpli">
        <i>malpli</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mielo">
        <i>miel</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tre">
        <i>multe</i> 
        <par n="tro__preadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="multe pli">
        <i>multe<b/>pli</i> 
        <par n="tro__preadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nek">
        <i>nek</i> 
        <par n="kaj__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ofte">
        <i>oft</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="optimisma">
        <i>optimism</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pli">
        <i>pli</i> 
        <par n="tro__preadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="por ke">
        <i>por<b/>ke</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="posteno">
        <i>posten</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="preskaŭ">
        <i>preskaŭ</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pro tio ke">
        <i>pro<b/>tio<b/>ke</i> 
        <par n="kaj__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="saluton">
        <i>saluton</i> 
        <par n="adiós__ij" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="samtempe ke">
        <i>samtempe<b/>ke</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sed">
        <i>sed</i> 
        <par n="kaj__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="senkaŝe">
        <i>senkaŝ</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="solena">
        <i>solen</i> 
        <par n="a__adj" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sorto">
        <i>sort</i> 
        <par n="o__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sufiĉe">
        <i>sufiĉe</i> 
        <par n="tro__preadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tre">
        <i>tre</i> 
        <par n="tro__preadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tro da">
        <i>tro<b/>da</i> 
        <par n="jam__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="verŝajne">
        <i>verŝajn</i> 
        <par n="e__adv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiufoje">
        <i>ĉiufoje</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
